District of Columbia statutes.
10-1103.10

Rules.

The Chief Financial Officer, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this part.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1162, Pub. L. 90-596, title III, § 311
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 6002(h), 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of Pub. L. 90-596, § 311, see §§ 6002(h) and 6003(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of Pub. L. 90-596, § 311, see § 6002(h) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of Pub. L. 90-596, § 311, see § 6002(h) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).